Hawaii statutes.
[§657-5.5] Judgments for support.
Every judgment for child support, including a judgment for reimbursement or
other arrears, shall be presumed to be paid and discharged on the thirty-third
birthday of the child for which the order of support was rendered or by the
expiration of the latest period provided in section 657-5, whichever date is
later. [L 1997, c 294, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next